Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 54
THREE-MEMBER BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS WITH CHANGES IN OTHER COUNTY OFFICES

Sec.

§ 31-5401. Three-member board of county commissioners with changes in other offices.

The form of government provided in this chapter shall consist of an elected board of county commissioners comprised of three (3) members and the other officers specified in the resolution or petition from the choices provided in sections 31-5404 through 31-5409, Idaho Code.

§ 31-5402. Board of county commissioners — Authority — Change in term of office.

The board of county commissioners shall be vested with all executive and legislative authority of the county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-703, Idaho Code, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the petition or resolution to adopt the optional form of government provided in this chapter may specify that all members of the board of county commissioners be elected to serve terms of four (4) years. If approved by the electors, the commissioner for each district shall be elected to a term of four (4) years upon the expiration of the commissioner’s current term of office.

The resolution or petition shall specify whether the provisions of section 31-703, Idaho Code, shall continue to govern the terms of office of the members of the commission or whether the terms of office of the members of the commission shall be changed as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

§ 31-5403. Other offices.

The resolution or petition to adopt the form of government provided in this chapter shall further define the structure of the form by including one (1) selection from the choices specified for the offices listed in sections 31-5404 through 31-5409, Idaho Code.

If the resolution or petition provides for the election of any new officers, such officers shall be elected at the general election following the adoption of the optional form of county government provided for in this chapter.

§ 31-5404. County clerk, ex officio auditor and recorder.

For purposes of this act the duties and responsibilities of the county clerk shall be as provided in chapter 10, title 1, Idaho Code, and chapter 7, title 31, Idaho Code, or as otherwise prescribed by law; the duties of the county clerk as ex officio county auditor shall be as provided in chapter 23, title 31, Idaho Code, or as otherwise prescribed by law; and the duties of the county clerk as ex officio county recorder shall be as provided in chapter 24, title 31, Idaho Code, or as otherwise prescribed by law. A county clerk, ex officio auditor and recorder:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office specified in the petition or resolution, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform the duties and responsibilities of the county clerk, ex officio auditor and recorder; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and shall perform the duties and responsibilities of the county clerk, ex officio auditor and recorder; or

The office shall be divided into two (2) or three (3) separate offices, with the persons to fill those offices to be elected or appointed in the manner provided in subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section. The petition or resolution shall identify the name, duties and responsibilities of each office; or

The office shall be eliminated as a separate office with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other elected officers or appointed persons as provided in the petition or resolution. The petition or resolution shall identify the duties of the office for which each other officer or appointee shall be responsible. The duties of the office as clerk of the district court, as provided in chapter 10, title 1, Idaho Code, may not be consolidated with the office of the sheriff or prosecuting attorney.

§ 31-5405. County treasurer, ex officio tax collector and public administrator.

For purposes of this act, the duties of the county treasurer as ex officio public administrator shall be as provided in chapter 1, title 14, Idaho Code; and the duties of the county treasurer as county treasurer and ex officio tax collector shall be as provided in chapters 15 and 21, title 31, Idaho Code, and title 63, Idaho Code, and as otherwise prescribed by law. A county treasurer, ex officio tax collector and public administrator:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office to be specified in the petition or resolution, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and perform all the duties of the office; or

The office shall be divided into two (2) or three (3) separate offices, with the persons to fill those offices to be elected or appointed in the manner provided in subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section. The petition or resolution shall identify the name, duties and responsibilities of each office; or

The office shall be eliminated as a separate office with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other elected officers or appointed persons as provided in the petition or resolution. The petition or resolution shall identify those duties of the office for which each other officer or appointee shall be responsible.

§ 31-5406. County assessor.

For purposes of this act, the duties of the county assessor shall be as provided in title 63, Idaho Code, and as otherwise prescribed by law. A county assessor:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office as provided in the resolution or petition, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform all the duties of the office; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and perform all the duties of the office; or

The office shall be eliminated with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other elected officers or appointed persons as provided in the resolution or petition. The resolution or petition shall identify those duties of the office for which each other officer or appointee shall be responsible.

§ 31-5407. County sheriff.

For purposes of this act, the duties of the county sheriff shall be as provided in chapter 22, title 31, Idaho Code, and as otherwise prescribed by law. A county sheriff:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office as provided in the resolution or petition, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform all the duties of the office; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and perform all the duties of the office; or

The office shall be eliminated with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other qualified elected officers or appointed persons as provided in the resolution or petition. The office of sheriff may not be consolidated with the office of the prosecuting attorney or the office of the clerk of the district court. The resolution or petition shall identify those duties of the county sheriff for which each other officer or appointee shall be responsible.

§ 31-5408. County coroner.

For purposes of this act the duties of the county coroner shall be as provided in chapter 28, title 31, Idaho Code, and as otherwise prescribed by law. A county coroner:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office as provided in the resolution or petition, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform all the duties of the office; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and perform all the duties of the office; or

The office shall be eliminated with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other elected officers or appointed persons as provided in the resolution or petition. The resolution or petition shall identify those duties of the office for which each other officer or appointee shall be responsible.

§ 31-5409. County prosecuting attorney.

For purposes of this act, the duties of the county prosecuting attorney shall be as provided in chapter 26, title 31, Idaho Code, and as otherwise prescribed by law. A county prosecuting attorney:

Shall continue to be elected to a term of four (4) years and to perform all the duties and responsibilities of the office; or

Shall be elected to a different term of office as provided in the resolution or petition, but not to exceed four (4) years, and perform all the duties of the office; or

Shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and perform all the duties of the office; or

The office shall be eliminated with the duties and responsibilities of the office to be performed by one (1) or more other qualified elected officers, appointed persons, or persons retained on a contractual basis as provided in the resolution or petition. The office of prosecuting attorney may not be consolidated with the office of sheriff or the office of clerk of the district court. The resolution or petition shall identify those duties of the office for which each other officer, appointee or party to the contract shall be responsible.